Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.370

Evaluation of parties—Selection of evaluators.

The court may order expert evaluations of parties to obtain information regarding visitation issues or other issues in a case. These evaluations shall be performed by appointed evaluators who are mutually agreed upon by the court, the department, and the parents' counsel, and, if the child is to be evaluated, by the representative for the child. If no agreement can be reached, the court shall select the expert evaluator.

[ 2018 c 284 s 28; 2009 c 520 s 44; 2004 c 146 s 2.]